Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201266-901
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of solar energy
and wind energy in Nebraska: (1) Can help reduce the nation's reliance upon
irreplaceable domestic and imported fossil fuels; (2) can reduce air and water
pollution resulting from the use of conventional energy sources; (3) requires
effective legislation and efficient administration of state and local programs
to be of greatest value to its citizens; and (4) is of such importance to
the public health, safety, and welfare that the state should take appropriate
action to encourage its use.

As the use of solar energy and wind energy devices increases, the possibility
of future shading and obstruction of such devices by structures or vegetation
will also increase. The Legislature therefor declares that the purpose of
sections 66-901 to 66-914 is to promote the public health, safety, and welfare
by protecting access to solar energy and wind energy as
provided in sections 66-901 to 66-914.

Laws 1979, LB 353, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 1.
March 8, 2012